Utah statutes.
76-8-707.   Assistance by local authorities.
(1)  If, in the judgment of the chief administrative officer of any
institution of higher education, or in the judgment of any officer or employee
designated by him to maintain order on a campus or related facility, the law
enforcement agency or security department of that institution lacks sufficient
manpower to deal effectively with any condition of unrest existing or
developing on a campus or related facility of the institution, he may call for
assistance from the county sheriff of the county or any city law enforcement
agency or from the Department of Public Safety.
(2)  Upon receipt of the request, the county sheriff, city law enforcement
agency, or Department of Public Safety must render all necessary assistance
without expense to the institution of higher education.
(3)  All personnel while rendering assistance shall serve under the general
direction of the chief administrative officer of the institution or the
officer or employee designated by him to maintain order on the campus or
related facility.
